Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-7303
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the School District Property Tax Relief Act:

(1) School district has the same meaning as in section 79-101; and

(2) School district taxes means property taxes levied on real property in this state by a school district or multiple-district school system, excluding any property taxes levied for bonded indebtedness and any property taxes levied as a result of an override of limits on property tax levies approved by voters pursuant to section 77-3444.

Laws 2024, First Spec. Sess., LB34, § 11.